Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1563.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3003.8 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended to read:Section 3003.8. Method of Filing.--(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law and except as provided under subsection (c), the Department of Revenue [may] shall allow the electronic or telephonic filing of any tax return or documents or the remittance of a payment for a fee or tax liability under this act.12345678910111213141516171819202122 (b) For the purposes of this section, the Department of Revenue may determine alternative methods for the following:(1) The signing, subscribing or verifying of a return, statement or other document that shall have the same validity and consequences as the actual signing by the taxpayer.(2) The remittance of a payment for a fee or tax liability under this act.(c) For the purposes of this section, the Department of Revenue may phase out the telephonic filing of any tax return or documents when the tax revenue collected no longer exceeds the cost of offering the service.Section 2. The amendment of section 3003.8 of the act shall apply to the filing of any tax return or documents or the remittance of a payment for a fee or tax liability beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1563PN1848 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516